Hawaii statutes.
§490:2A-515 Acceptance of goods. (a)
Acceptance of goods occurs after the lessee has had a reasonable opportunity to
inspect the goods and:

(1) The lessee signifies or acts with respect to the
goods in a manner that signifies to the lessor or the supplier that the goods
are conforming or that the lessee will take or retain them in spite of their
nonconformity; or

(2) The lessee fails to make an effective rejection
of the goods (section 490:2A-509(b)).

(b) Acceptance of a part of any commercial
unit is acceptance of that entire unit. [L 1991, c 40, pt of §1]

Case Notes

Where photo processing machine was not delivered to plaintiff
and plaintiff thus did not have a reasonable time to inspect the machine,
leasing company did not show that plaintiff agreed to accept the machine before
delivery under this section by signing the acceptance certificate. 104 H. 148
(App.), 85 P.3d 1099.

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next